Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.060

Studies and adoption of classifications for school district budgets—Publication.

The superintendent of public instruction and the state auditor jointly, and in cooperation with the senate and house committees on education, shall conduct appropriate studies and adopt classifications or revised classifications under RCW 28A.505.100, defining what expenditures shall be charged to each budget class including administration. The studies and classifications shall be published in the form of a manual or revised manual, suitable for use by the governing bodies of school districts, by the superintendent of public instruction, and by the legislature.

[ 1991 c 116 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 253; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.350.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.